Louisiana, session 2026, HB1156.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1104(C)(introductory paragraph) and (E) and 1104.2(I) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 30:1103(17) through (46) and Part II of Chapter 11 of
Subtitle I of Title 30 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 30:1121
through 1121.51 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1103. Definitions
Unless the context otherwise requires, the words defined in this Section have
the following meaning when found in this Chapter:
* * *
(17) "Administrator" means the Administrator of the Pipeline and Hazardous
Materials Safety Administration (PHMSA) or his delegate.
(18) "Carbon dioxide plume" means the extent underground, in three
dimensions, of an injected carbon dioxide stream.
(19) "Carbon dioxide stream" means the carbon dioxide that has been
captured from an emission source, plus incidental associated substances derived from
the source materials and the capture process, and any substances added to the stream
to enable or improve the injection process.
(20) "Casing" means a metallic or nonmetallic tubing or pipe of varying
diameter and weight, lowered into a borehole during or after drilling in order to
support the sides of the hole and thus prevent the walls from caving, to prevent loss
Page 2 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
of drilling mud into porous ground, or to prevent water, gas, or other fluid from
entering or leaving the hole.
(21) "Cementing" means the operation whereby a cement slurry is pumped
into a drilled hole or forced behind the casing.
(22) "Component" means any part of a pipeline which may be subjected to
pump pressure including but not limited to pipe, valves, elbows, tees, flanges, and
closures.
(23) "Confirmed discovery" means a reasonable determination, based on
information available to the operator at the time a reportable event has occurred,
even if only based on a preliminary evaluation.
(24) "Confining zone" means a geological formation, group of formations,
or part of a formation stratigraphically overlying the injection zone that acts as a
barrier to fluid movement above an injection zone.
(25) "Corrective action" means the use of methods approved by the
department's underground injection control program to ensure that wells within the
area of review do not serve as conduits for the movement of fluids into underground
sources of drinking water.
(26) "Flow rate" means the volume per time unit given to the flow of gases
or other fluid substance which emerges from an orifice, pump, turbine, or passes
along a conduit or channel.
(27) "Geologic sequestration" means the long-term containment of a
gaseous, liquid, or supercritical carbon dioxide stream in subsurface geologic
formations. This term does not apply to carbon dioxide capture or transport.
(28) "Ground water" means water below the land surface in a zone of
saturation.
(29) "High consequence area" includes the following:
(a) Commercially navigable waterways, where a substantial likelihood of
commercial navigation exists.
Page 3 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(b) High population areas or urbanized areas, as defined and delineated by
the United States Census Bureau, that contain fifty thousand or more people and has
a population density of at least one thousand people per square mile.
(c) Other populated areas or places, as defined and delineated by the United
States Census Bureau, that contain a concentrated population, such as an
incorporated or unincorporated city, town, village, or other designated residential or
commercial area.
(30) "Injection zone" means a geological formation, group of formations, or
part of a formation receiving fluids through a well. For Class VI projects, it must
also be of sufficient areal extent, thickness, porosity, and permeability to receive
carbon dioxide through a well or wells associated with a geologic sequestration
project.
(31) "Personal protective equipment" means clothing, equipment, and
devices worn on, or carried by, a person to minimize exposure to hazards.
(32) "PHMSA" means the Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety
Administration.
(33) "Pipe" or "line pipe" means a tube, usually cylindrical, through which
carbon dioxide flows from one point to another.
(34) "Pipeline" or "pipeline system" means all parts of a pipeline facility
through which carbon dioxide moves in transportation including but not limited to
line pipe, valves, and other appurtenances connected to line pipe, pumping units,
fabricated assemblies associated with pumping units, and metering and delivery
stations and fabricated assemblies therein.
(35) "Pipeline facility" means new and existing pipe, rights-of-way, and any
equipment, facility, or building used in the transportation of carbon dioxide.
(36) "Plugging" means the act or process of stopping the flow of water, oil
or gas into or out of a formation through a borehole or well penetrating that
formation.
Page 4 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(37) "Point of injection" means the last accessible sampling point prior to
release into the subsurface environment through an injection well.
(38) "Post-injection site care" means the appropriate monitoring and other
actions, including corrective action, needed following cessation of geologic
sequestration injection to ensure that underground sources of drinking water are not
endangered.
(39) "Pressure front" means the zone of elevated pressure in the subsurface
created by injection where there is a pressure differential sufficient to cause the
movement of injected fluids or formation fluids into an underground source of
drinking water.
(40) "Public water system" means a system for the provision to the public
of piped water for human consumption, if such system has at least fifteen service
connections or regularly serves at least twenty-five individuals and includes any
collection, pretreatment, treatment, storage, and distribution facilities used primarily
in connection with the system.
(41) "Rupture-mitigation valve" means an automatic shut-off valve or a
remote-control valve that a pipeline operator uses to minimize the volume of carbon
dioxide released from the pipeline and to mitigate the consequences of a rupture.
(42) "Site closure" means the point or time, as determined by the
department's underground injection control program, at which the owner or operator
of a geologic sequestration site is released from post-injection site care
responsibilities.
(43) "Underground source of drinking water" means an aquifer or portion of
an aquifer which supplies any public water system or contains a sufficient quantity
of ground water to supply a public water system and which currently supplies
drinking water for human consumption or contains fewer than ten thousand
milligrams per liter of total dissolved solids and which is not an exempted aquifer.
(44) "Well monitoring" means the measurement by on-site instruments or
laboratory methods of the quality of water in a well.
Page 5 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(45) "Well stimulation" means processes used to clean the well bore, enlarge
channels, and increase pore space in the interval to be injected enabling fluids to
move more readily into the formation.
(46) "Workover" means to perform one or more of a variety of remedial
operations on an injection well, such as cleaning, perforation, changing tubing,
deepening, squeezing, plugging back, and other measures.
§1104. Duties and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations; permits
* * *
C. Prior to the use of any reservoir for the storage of carbon dioxide and
prior to the exercise of eminent domain pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 19:2(11)
and R.S. 30:1108 by any person, firm, or corporation having such right under laws
of the state of Louisiana, and as a condition precedent to such use or to the exercise
of such rights of eminent domain pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 19:2(11) and
R.S. 30:1108, the secretary, after public hearing pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
30:6, held in the parish where the storage facility is to be located, shall have found
at least one of the following:
* * *
E. The secretary may issue any necessary order providing that all carbon
dioxide which has previously been reduced to possession and which is subsequently
injected into a storage reservoir shall at all times be deemed the property of the party
that owns such carbon dioxide, whether at the time of injection or pursuant to a
change of ownership by agreement while the carbon dioxide is located in the storage
facility, his successors and assigns; and in no event shall such carbon dioxide be
subject to the right of the owner of the surface of the lands or of any mineral interest
therein under which such storage reservoir shall lie or be adjacent to or of any person
other than the owner, his successors, and assigns to produce, take, reduce to
possession, waste, or otherwise interfere with or exercise any control there over,
provided that the owner, his successors, and assigns shall have no right to gas, liquid
hydrocarbons, salt, or other commercially recoverable minerals in any stratum or
Page 6 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
portion thereof not determined by the secretary to constitute an approved storage
reservoir. The secretary shall issue such orders, rules, and regulations as may be
necessary for the purpose of protecting any such storage reservoir, strata, or
formations against pollution or against the escape of carbon dioxide therefrom,
including such necessary rules and regulations as may pertain to the drilling into or
through such storage reservoir in compliance with the provisions of Part II of this
Chapter.
* * *
§1104.2. Unitization
* * *
I. Except as provided in R.S. 30:1108(B)(2), nothing in this Section shall
prevent persons having the right to do so from drilling through the storage unit in
such manner as shall comply with the requirements of Part II of this Chapter and any
rules of the commissioner secretary issued for the purpose of protecting the storage
unit or an associated storage facility against pollution or invasion and against the
escape or migration of carbon dioxide.
* * *
PART II. CARBON DIOXIDE SEQUESTRATION SAFETY REQUIREMENTS
§1121. Applicability; construction with other laws
A. The provisions of this Part shall act as minimum criteria, standards, and
requirements regarding Class VI injection wells and pipelines transporting carbon
dioxide for geologic sequestration and shall not be construed to limit the secretary's
authority to promulgate and enforce any rules deemed necessary or appropriate to
ensure the safety of the public, emergency responders, and the natural resources of
the state, including underground sources of drinking water.
B. Nothing contained in this Part shall be construed to relieve Class VI
injection well permit applicants, owners, or operators or transporters of carbon
dioxide for geologic sequestration from compliance with all applicable rules
promulgated by state and federal agencies. Any conflict between the provisions of
Page 7 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
this Part and applicable federal law, federal regulations, or state regulations required
to be promulgated by federal law or regulations shall be resolved in favor of the
latter.
C. The secretary may, to the extent he deems necessary or proper, waive in
whole or in part compliance with any standard established under this Part, or modify,
vary, or supplement the requirements of this Part, if he determines that compliance
with such standard or requirement would cause the department or an operator to
come into noncompliance with federal law or regulations or with any controlling
agreement between the state and the federal government.
D. The requirements of this Part may be accomplished as part of, or in
conjunction with, any other applicable safety requirements pursuant to state or
federal law. Operators are not required to duplicate their efforts to satisfy the
provisions of this Part if any such requirements are met pursuant to other applicable
legal requirements. The department may accept documentation or other evidence of
the operator's compliance with the provisions of this Part as appropriate to
implement this Subsection.
SUBPART A. GENERAL
§1121.1. Scope
The provisions of this Subpart shall apply to both storage facilities and
pipelines transporting carbon dioxide for geologic sequestration.
§1121.2. Right-to-Know law; applicability
A. Owners and operators shall be subject to the requirements of the Right-
to-Know laws contained in R.S. 30:2361, et seq. and the administrative rules
promulgated thereunder.
B. Storage facilities and pipelines governed by this Chapter shall be
considered "facilities" for the purposes of R.S. 30:2363.
Page 8 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
§1121.3. First responders; educational materials; emergency alert system
Prior to the commencement of operations, operators of storage facilities and
pipelines shall coordinate with state and local emergency response agencies to
accomplish the following:
(1) Prepare materials or programming designed to educate first responders,
state and local governmental entities, and the public regarding the unique
characteristics of a carbon dioxide release, how to identify a carbon dioxide release,
how to report a suspected carbon dioxide release, and appropriate response actions.
(2) Identify the equipment and supplies necessary for effective emergency
response to a release of carbon dioxide. At a minimum, the fire department having
primary jurisdiction within a storage facility's area of review and one fire department
in each parish traversed by pipeline which is likely to provide the initial response to
a release shall have all equipment and supplies identified as necessary by the
operator in their possession or readily available for their use prior to the
commencement of injection or transportation operations. In addition, if any such fire
department is lacking personal protective equipment identified as necessary during
the pre-operational planning, the operator shall provide such personal protective
equipment to the department. Operators, in coordination with appropriate emergency
response agencies, shall periodically review the list of equipment and supplies
deemed necessary for response and modify the list as appropriate to ensure that first
responders are in the best position possible to properly and safely respond to a
release.
(3) Implement an emergency alert system that functions to alert all persons
that may be impacted by any incident that poses an immediate threat to public health,
safety, or welfare. This requirement may be met by using existing public service
programs.
Page 9 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
SUBPART B. CLASS VI INJECTION WELL SAFETY REQUIREMENTS
§1121.21. Scope
The provisions of this Subpart shall apply to all applicants for Class VI
permits and the owners and operators of Class VI wells as well as the owners and
operators seeking to convert authorized Class I, II, or V wells to Class VI wells.
§1121.22. General prohibitions; powers and duties of the secretary; administrative
requirements
A. Prohibition of unauthorized injection. Any underground injection, except
as authorized by a permit or rule, is prohibited. Construction or operation of any
well required to have a permit pursuant to this Chapter and the rules promulgated
thereunder is prohibited until the permit has been issued. Any underground injection
that violates any provision of this Chapter or the rules promulgated thereunder is
subject to enforcement action.
B. The secretary may prescribe additional requirements for Class VI wells
or projects in order to protect underground sources of drinking water and the health,
safety, and welfare of the public. In order to protect the health, safety, and welfare
of the public, the secretary shall establish and may, from time to time, amend
restrictions on incidental constituents in the carbon dioxide stream of any well
permitted pursuant to this Chapter.
C. General administrative requirements.
(1) All tests, reports, logs, surveys, plans, applications, or other submittals
required by this Subpart or applicable rules and regulations, or submitted for
informational purposes, are required to bear the Department of Conservation and
Energy serial number of any Class VI carbon dioxide sequestration well associated
with the submittal.
(2) All applications, reports, plans, requests, maps, cross-sections, drawings,
opinions, recommendations, calculations, evaluations, or other submittals including
or comprising geoscientific work as defined by R.S. 37:711.1 et seq. shall be
prepared, sealed, signed, and dated by a licensed professional geoscientist authorized
Page 10 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
to practice by and in good standing with the Louisiana Board of Professional
Geoscientists.
(3) All applications, reports, plans, requests, specifications, details,
calculations, drawings, opinions, recommendations, evaluations, or other submittals
including or comprising the practice of engineering as defined by R.S. 37:681 et seq.
shall be prepared, sealed, signed, and dated by a licensed professional engineer
authorized to practice by and in good standing with the Louisiana Professional
Engineering and Land Surveying Board.
§1121.23. Duties of a permittee
A. A permittee shall, at a minimum, comply with all of the following duties:
(1) Duty to comply. The permittee shall comply with all conditions of the
permit. Any permit noncompliance constitutes a violation and is grounds for
enforcement action; permit termination, revocation and reissuance, or modification;
or denial of a permit renewal application if the secretary determines that such
noncompliance endangers underground sources of drinking water.
(2) Duty to reapply. If the permittee wishes to continue an activity regulated
by a permit after the expiration date of his permit, the permittee must apply for and
obtain a new permit.
(3) Duty to halt or reduce activity. It shall not be a defense for a permittee
in an enforcement action that it would have been necessary to halt or reduce the
permitted activity in order to maintain compliance with the conditions of the permit.
(4) Duty to mitigate. The permittee shall take all reasonable steps to
minimize or correct any adverse impact on the environment, such as the
contamination of underground sources of drinking water, resulting from
noncompliance with the permit.
(5) Proper operation and maintenance. The permittee shall at all times
properly operate and maintain all facilities, systems of treatment and control, and
related appurtenances which are installed or used by the permittee to achieve
compliance with the conditions of the permit. Proper operation and maintenance
Page 11 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
includes effective performance, adequate funding, adequate operation staffing and
training, and adequate laboratory process controls, including appropriate quality
assurance procedures.
(6) Inspection and entry. The permittee shall allow inspection and entry as
provided in R.S. 30:4.
(7) Duty to establish and maintain mechanical integrity. The permittee shall
establish mechanical integrity prior to commencing injection. Thereafter, the
permittee shall maintain mechanical integrity and shall give notice to the department
when it is determined the injection well is lacking mechanical integrity. If
mechanical integrity is lacking, the operator shall immediately cease injection into
the well and the well shall remain out of injection service until such time as well
mechanical integrity is restored to the satisfaction of the department. The operator
may only resume injection upon written notification from the department that the
owner or operator has demonstrated mechanical integrity.
B. The issuance of a permit does not authorize any injury to persons or
property or invasion of other private rights, or any infringement of state or local law
or regulations.
C. Financial Responsibility.
(1) The permit shall require the permittee to have and maintain financial
responsibility, insurance, and resources in compliance with this Subsection and
applicable department rules for all phases of the geologic sequestration project prior
to the issuance of authorization to begin operations.
(2) The secretary shall prescribe acceptable forms of financial responsibility
and the manner by which a permittee shall demonstrate that appropriate financial
responsibility instruments have been secured and maintained, including periodic
review of existing financial responsibility for sufficient coverage. The secretary may
disapprove the use of a financial instrument if he determines it is not sufficient to
meet the financial responsibility requirements.
Page 12 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(3) Qualifying financial responsibility instruments shall be sufficient to
address endangerment of underground sources of drinking water and to cover the
costs of meeting the following requirements:
(a) Corrective action.
(b) Injection well plugging.
(c) Post-injection site care and site closure.
(d) Emergency and remedial response.
(4) In addition, the operator shall maintain third party insurance at a
sufficient level to respond to any emergency or to perform any remedial action
required.
(5) In order to determine the sufficiency of financial security and insurance,
the secretary shall require the operator to prepare detailed written estimates of the
costs of performing corrective action, plugging, post-injection site care and closure,
and emergency and remedial response.
§1121.24. Siting criteria; area of review and corrective action
A. Applicants for Class VI permits and the owners and operators of Class VI
wells shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that Class VI wells are
sited in accordance with the provisions of this Section.
B. At a minimum, the geologic criteria for siting shall include the following:
(1) An injection zone of sufficient areal extent, thickness, porosity, and
permeability to receive the total anticipated volume of the carbon dioxide stream.
(2) The point of injection shall be at least one mile below the lowermost
extent of an underground source of drinking water.
(3) Confining zones free of transmissive faults or fractures and of sufficient
areal extent and integrity to contain the injected carbon dioxide stream and displaced
formation fluids and to allow injection at proposed maximum pressures and volumes
without initiating or propagating fractures in the confining zones.
(4) Confining zones shall in no event be less than three hundred feet thick.
Page 13 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
C. Area of review and corrective action plan. The owner or operator of a
Class VI well shall prepare, maintain, and comply with a plan to delineate the area
of review for the proposed geologic sequestration project, periodically reevaluate the
delineation, and perform corrective action as approved by the department. The
secretary shall ensure the following minimum requirements are met:
(1) Area of review delineation.
(a) The area of review shall be delineated using computational modeling that
accounts for the physical and chemical properties of all phases of the injected carbon
dioxide stream and displaced fluids and shall be based on available site
characterization, monitoring, and operational data.
(b) The method for delineating the area of review as well as the model to be
used, assumptions that will be made, and site characterization data on which the
model will be based shall be included in the plan submitted to the department for
approval.
(c) Modeling shall include the projected migration of the carbon dioxide
plume and formation fluids from commencement of injection activities through a
department-approved terminal point. The model shall be based on geological data
and site characterization, anticipated operating data for the life of the project, and the
potential for migration through natural and artificial penetrations. The plan
submitted shall account for any irregularities and data quality characteristics that
may impact these model predictions.
(2) Corrective action.
(a) An applicant shall be required to perform all of the following:
(i) Identify all artificial penetrations of confining and injection zones within
the area of review using department-approved methods.
(ii) Provide a description for each penetration, including well type,
construction, date drilled, location, depth, record of plugging or completion, and any
additional information the department may require.
Page 14 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(iii) Determine which abandoned wells in the area of review have been
plugged in a manner that prevents the movement of carbon dioxide or other fluids
that may endanger underground sources of drinking water, including use of materials
compatible with the carbon dioxide stream.
(b) Owners or operators of Class VI wells shall perform corrective action on
all wells in the area of review that are determined to need corrective action, using
methods approved by the department.
(3) Reevaluation. Owners or operators shall reevaluate the area of review
delineation and corrective action required as provided in this Paragraph.
(a) Regularly scheduled reevaluation shall be conducted based on a fixed
term no longer than five years.
(b) Reevaluation may also be required prior to the next scheduled
reevaluation when warranted by monitoring and operational conditions and data and
such conditions and data shall be provided for in the approved plan.
(c) Following any reevaluation, the owner or operator shall submit to the
department either an amended area of review and corrective action plan or
demonstrate to the department's satisfaction that an amended plan is not necessary.
Amended plans are subject to department approval. Approved amendments to the
plan shall be incorporated into the permit and may be subject to permit modification
requirements provided by administrative rules.
(d) All modeling inputs and data used to support reevaluations shall be
retained for at least ten years.
D. Setbacks. No Class VI injection wellhead shall be located within five
hundred feet of the following:
(1) Inhabited dwellings not owned by the storage operator or any owner in
interest bound by a contract with the storage operator that allows for location of a
Class VI injection well within five hundred feet of an inhabited dwelling.
(2) Schools.
(3) Healthcare facilities.
Page 15 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(4) Class VI injection operations shall not adversely affect any Class I waste
plume existing at the time of permitting.
E. The geologic sequestration of carbon dioxide is not permitted in
solution-mined salt caverns under these provisions.
§1121.25. Well construction and completion
A. Owners or operators of Class VI wells shall demonstrate to the
satisfaction of the department that Class VI wells are constructed and completed in
accordance with the provisions of this Section.
B. Injection well construction requirements.
(1) All phases of Class VI well construction shall be supervised by a person
knowledgeable and experienced in practical drilling engineering and familiar with
the special conditions and requirements of injection well construction.
(2) All materials and equipment used in the construction of the well and
related appurtenances shall be designed and manufactured to exceed the operating
requirements of the specific project, including flow induced vibrations.
(3) The owner or operator shall ensure that all wells are constructed and
completed to:
(a) Prevent the movement of fluids into or between underground sources of
drinking water or into any unauthorized zones.
(b) Allow the use of appropriate testing devices and workover tools.
(c) Allow for continuous monitoring of the annulus space between the
injection tubing and long string casing.
(4) Materials used in the construction of each Class VI well shall have
sufficient structural strength and be designed for the life of the geologic
sequestration project. All well materials shall also be compatible with fluids with
which the materials may be expected to come into contact and shall meet or exceed
industry standards which are developed for such materials and accepted by the
department.
(5) Casing and cementing of Class VI wells.
Page 16 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(a) The surface casing of any Class VI well shall extend into a confining bed
below the base of the deepest formation containing an underground source of
drinking water. No exceptions or variances may be granted regarding the surface
casing setting depth.
(b) The casing shall be cemented with a sufficient volume of cement to
circulate cement from the casing shoe to the surface. A copy of the cementing
company's job summary or cementing tickets indicating returns to the surface shall
be submitted as part of the pre-operating requirements. The department may approve
alternative methods of cementing in cases where the cement cannot be circulated.
(c) At least one long string casing, using a sufficient number of centralizers,
shall be utilized in the well. If the casing is to be perforated for injection, then the
approved casing shall extend through the base of the injection zone. If an approved
alternate construction method is used, such as the setting of a screen, the casing shall
be set to the top of the injection interval.
(d) Cement and cement additives shall be compatible with the carbon dioxide
stream and formation fluids and of sufficient quality and quantity to maintain
integrity over the design life of the geologic sequestration project.
(e) The integrity and location of the cement shall be verified using
technology capable of evaluating cement quality radially and identifying the location
of channels to ensure that underground sources of drinking water are not endangered.
(f) In order to allow the department to evaluate casing and cementing
requirements, the owner or operator shall provide, at a minimum, the following
information:
(i) Depth to the injection zone.
(ii) Injection pressure, external pressure, internal pressure, and axial loading.
(iii) Hole size.
(iv) Size and grade of all casing strings.
(v) Corrosiveness of the carbon dioxide stream and formation fluids.
(vi) Down-hole temperatures.
Page 17 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(vii) Lithology of injection and confining zones.
(viii) Type or grade of cement and cement additives including slurry weight
and yield.
(ix) Quantity, chemical composition, and temperature of the carbon dioxide
stream.
(x) Any additional information requested by the department.
(6) Casing and casing seat tests. The owner or operator shall monitor and
record the tests using a surface readout pressure gauge and a chart or a digital
recorder. All instruments shall be calibrated properly and in good working order.
If there is a failure of the required tests, the owner or operator shall take necessary
corrective action to obtain a passing test.
(a) After cementing each casing, but before drilling out the respective casing
shoe, all casings shall be hydrostatically pressure tested to verify casing integrity and
the absence of leaks. Casing test pressures shall never exceed the rated burst or
collapse pressures of the respective casings.
(b) The casing seat and cement of any intermediate and injection casings
shall be hydrostatically pressure tested after drilling out the casing shoe. Casing seat
test pressures shall never exceed the known or calculated fracture gradient of the
appropriate subsurface formation.
(7) Tubing and packer. Injection into a Class VI well shall be through tubing
with a packer set at a depth opposite an interval of cemented casing at a location
approved by the secretary. In order for the department to determine and specify
requirements for the tubing and packer, the owner or operator shall submit the
following information:
(a) Depth of setting.
(b) Characteristics of the carbon dioxide stream and formation fluids.
(c) Maximum proposed injection pressure.
(d) Maximum proposed annular pressure.
(e) Proposed injection rate and volume or mass of the carbon dioxide stream.
Page 18 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(f) Size of tubing and casing.
(g) Tubing tensile, burst, and collapse strengths.
(h) Any other information required by the department.
C. Logging, sampling, and testing prior to injection well operation.
(1) During the drilling and construction of a Class VI well, appropriate logs,
surveys, and tests, as determined by the department, shall be run to determine or
verify the depth, thickness, porosity, permeability, and lithology of all relevant
geologic formations and the salinity of formation fluids to ensure conformance with
injection well construction requirements and to establish accurate baseline data
against which future measurements may be compared. The well operator shall
submit to the department a descriptive report prepared by a knowledgeable log
analyst that includes an interpretation of the results of such logs and tests.
(2) The owner or operator shall take whole cores or sidewall cores of the
injection zone and confining system and formation fluid samples from the injection
zone and shall submit to the department a detailed report prepared by a log analyst
that includes well logs and well log analyses, core analyses, and formation fluid
sample information. The department may accept information on cores from nearby
wells if the owner or operator can demonstrate that core retrieval is not possible and
that such cores are representative of conditions at the well. The department may
require the owner or operator to core other formations in the borehole.
(3) The owner or operator shall record the fluid temperature, pH,
conductivity, reservoir pressure, and static fluid level of the injection zone.
(4) At a minimum, the owner or operator shall determine or calculate the
following information concerning the injection and confining zones:
(a) Fracture pressure.
(b) Other physical and chemical characteristics of the injection and confining
zones.
(c) Physical and chemical characteristics of the formation fluids in the
injection zone.
Page 19 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(5) Upon completion, but before operating, the owner or operator shall
conduct the following tests to verify hydrogeologic characteristics of the injection
zone:
(a) A pressure fall-off test.
(b) A pump test or injectivity tests.
(6) The owner or operator shall notify the department at least seventy-two
hours before conducting any wireline logs, well tests, or reservoir tests.
§1121.26. Pre-operation approval
A. The owner or operator shall not operate a Class VI well without first
obtaining final approval from the department.
B. The owner or operator shall submit the following information to the
department for consideration of final approval:
(1) The final area of review based on modeling, using data obtained during
logging and testing of the well and subsurface formations as required by this Section
and applicable department rules.
(2) Any relevant updates to information submitted in the permit application
regarding the geologic structure and hydrogeologic properties of the proposed
storage site and overlying formations, based on data obtained during logging and
testing of the well and subsurface formations.
(3) Information on the compatibility of the carbon dioxide stream with all
of the following:
(a) Fluids in the injection zone.
(b) Minerals in both the injection and the confining zones, based on the
results of the formation testing program.
(c) The materials used to construct the well.
(4) The results of the formation testing program required for the permit
application.
(5) Final injection well construction procedures that meet all applicable
requirements.
Page 20 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(6) The status of corrective action on wells in the area of review.
(7) All available data from the required logging and testing program.
(8) A demonstration of mechanical integrity.
(9) Any updates to the following submissions that are necessary to address
new information collected during the required logging and testing of the well and the
formation:
(a) The proposed area of review and corrective action plan.
(b) The testing and monitoring plan.
(c) The injection well plugging plan.
(d) The post-injection site care and site closure plan.
(e) The emergency and remedial response plan.
(f) The alternative post-injection site care timeframe demonstration.
(10) Any additional information requested by the department.
§1121.27. Injection well operating requirements
A. Owners or operators shall be responsible for ensuring that injection
pressure does not initiate fractures in confining zones or cause the movement of
injection or formation fluids that endanger an underground source of drinking water.
(1) In order to ensure that injection does not initiate new fractures or
propagate existing fractures in the injection zone, the injection well shall be operated
so that injection-induced pressure in injection zones does not exceed ninety percent
of the fracture pressure of the injection zone except during stimulation.
(2) All stimulation programs shall be included in the permit application and,
if approved by the department, incorporated into the permit.
B. Injection between the outermost casing protecting an underground source
of drinking water and the wellbore is prohibited.
C. The owner or operator shall fill the annulus between the tubing and the
long string casing with a non-corrosive fluid or a fluid containing a corrosion
inhibitor approved by the department.
Page 21 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
D. The owner or operator shall maintain a tubing-casing annulus pressure
that exceeds the operating injection pressure, unless authorized by the department
to prevent harming the integrity of the well or endangering an underground source
of drinking water. A request to operate the well at a reduced annulus pressure shall
be in writing and approved by the department.
E. The owner or operator shall maintain mechanical integrity of the injection
well at all times, except during authorized workovers, well maintenance, or well
remedial work.
F. Continuous recording devices shall be installed, used, and maintained in
proper working order for each well.
(1) The devices shall take digital recordings.
(2) The devices shall be weatherproof or housed in weatherproof enclosures
if located in areas exposed to climatic conditions.
(3) The devices shall monitor all of the following:
(a) Surface injection and bottom-hole pressure.
(b) Flow rate, volume or mass, and temperature of the carbon dioxide stream.
(c) Tubing-casing annulus pressure and annulus fluid volume.
(d) Any other data specified by the department.
G. Alarms and automatic shutdown systems designed to actuate on
exceedance of a predetermined monitored condition shall be installed and maintained
in proper working order.
(1) All alarms shall be integrated with an automatic shutdown system.
(2) All emergency shutdown systems shall be fail-safe. The operator shall
function-test all critical systems of control and safety at least once every six months.
This includes testing of alarms, test tripping of emergency shutdown valves to ensure
their closure times are within design specifications, and ensuring the integrity of all
electrical, pneumatic, and hydraulic circuits. Test dates and results shall be
documented and be available for inspection by an agent of the department.
Page 22 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(3) If a shutdown is triggered or a loss of mechanical integrity is discovered,
the owner or operator shall immediately investigate and identify as expeditiously as
possible the cause of the shutoff.
(4) If the well is found to be lacking mechanical integrity or monitored well
parameters indicate that the well may be lacking mechanical integrity, the owner or
operator shall do all of the following:
(a) Immediately cease injection.
(b) Take all steps reasonably necessary to determine whether there may have
been a release of the injected carbon dioxide stream or formation fluids into any
unauthorized zone.
(c) Notify the department within twenty-four hours.
(d) Restore and demonstrate mechanical integrity to the satisfaction of the
department prior to resuming injection.
(e) Notify the department when injection can be expected to resume.
H. Wellhead identification and protection.
(1) A protective barrier shall be installed and maintained around the
wellheads, piping, and above-ground structures that may be vulnerable to physical
or accidental damage by mobile equipment or trespassers.
(2) An identifying sign shall be placed at the wellhead of each injection well
and shall include, at a minimum, the operator's name, well name and number, well
serial number, section-township-range, and any other information required by the
department. The sign shall be of durable construction with all lettering kept in a
legible condition.
I. No well workovers, including remedial work, well maintenance or repair,
well or injection formation stimulation, well plug and abandonment or temporary
abandonment, any other test of the injection well conducted by the permittee, or well
work of any kind, shall be done without prior written authorization from the
department.
Page 23 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
J. Pressure gauges that show pressure on the injection tubing and
tubing-casing annulus shall be installed at each wellhead. All gauges shall be
properly calibrated and be maintained in good working order.
§1121.28. Emergency and remedial response; ground water contamination
A. Emergency and remedial response plan. As part of the permit application,
the owner or operator shall provide the department with an emergency and remedial
response plan that describes actions the owner or operator must take to address
movement of the injection or formation fluids that may cause an endangerment to an
underground source of drinking water during construction, operation, and
post-injection site care periods. The requirement to maintain and implement an
approved plan is directly enforceable regardless of whether the requirement is a
condition of the permit.
(1) The owner or operator shall review the emergency and remedial response
plan at least once every five years. Based on this review, the owner or operator shall
submit an amended emergency and remedial response plan or demonstrate to the
department that no amendment is needed. Any amendments to the emergency and
remedial response plan are subject to approval by the department. Any approved
amendments shall be incorporated into the permit and subject to the permit
modification requirements where deemed appropriate by the department. Amended
plans or demonstrations shall be submitted to the department as follows:
(a) Within one year of an area of review reevaluation.
(b) Following any significant changes to the facility.
(c) When required by the department.
(2) The emergency and remedial response plan shall provide for continuing
training programs for operating and maintenance personnel regarding potential
hazards, risk scenarios, and response activities.
(3) Prior to the commencement of injection, the owner or operator shall
provide a copy of the approved emergency and remedial response plan to the local
governing authority for each parish within the area of review for dissemination to the
Page 24 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
office of homeland security, local emergency preparedness committee, or other
emergency preparedness or response agencies.
B.(1) If the owner or operator obtains evidence that the injected carbon
dioxide stream or associated pressure front may cause endangerment, the owner or
operator shall do all of the following:
(a) Immediately cease injection.
(b) Take all steps reasonably necessary to identify and characterize any
release.
(c) Notify the department within twenty-four hours.
(d) Implement the emergency and remedial response plan approved by the
department.
(2) Injection prior to remediation may only resume if the owner or operator
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the injection operation will
not endanger underground sources of drinking water.
C. The owner or operator shall conduct at least one tabletop exercise for each
storage facility prior to the commencement of injection to simulate emergency
scenarios and responses thereto in coordination with the appropriate emergency
preparedness and response agencies.
D. Ground water contamination.
(1) Prohibition of movement of fluid into underground sources of drinking
water.
(a) No authorization by permit or rule shall allow the movement of fluid
containing any contaminant into underground sources of drinking water if the
presence of that contaminant may cause a violation of any primary federal or state
drinking water regulations or sanitary codes or may otherwise adversely affect the
health of persons. The applicant for a permit shall have the burden of showing that
the requirements of this Section are met.
(b) If water quality monitoring indicates the movement of any contaminant
into an underground source of drinking water, the secretary shall prescribe such
Page 25 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
additional requirements for construction, corrective action, operation, monitoring,
or reporting, including closure of the injection well, as are necessary to prevent such
movement.
(c) The secretary may take emergency action upon receipt of information
that a contaminant which is present in or likely to enter a public water system or
underground source of drinking water may present an imminent and substantial
endangerment to the health or safety of the public.
(2) Remediation.
(a) The storage operator shall have in place prior to injection operations a
remediation plan for ground water contamination. The plan shall include procedures
the operator will employ to remediate contamination caused by a loss of containment
from its storage facility to return an underground source of drinking water to its
previous condition.
(b) Upon request of a public water system within the area of review, the
storage operator shall cause routine sampling and testing of the water supply for the
public water system to be performed by a third party at the operator's expense. The
results of any testing performed pursuant to this Subparagraph shall be provided to
the public water system and to the department.
(c) If ground water monitoring indicates that a source of drinking water has
been rendered unsafe to drink or to use for agricultural purposes due to
contamination caused by a loss of containment from a storage facility, the storage
operator shall immediately execute the ground water remediation plan. The operator
shall provide an alternative supply of potable drinking water within twenty-four
hours and an alternative supply of water that is safe for other uses within thirty days.
The supplies of both potable water and water that is safe for other uses shall continue
until additional monitoring by the storage operator shows that the source of drinking
water is safe for drinking and other uses and such results are confirmed by
independent testing performed by the department.
Page 26 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
§1121.29. Testing and monitoring
A. Testing and monitoring plan. The owner or operator of a Class VI well
shall prepare, maintain, and comply with a testing and monitoring plan approved by
the department to verify that the geologic sequestration project is operating as
permitted and is not endangering underground sources of drinking water. The
requirement to maintain and implement an approved plan is directly enforceable
regardless of whether the requirement is a condition of the permit. The testing and
monitoring plan shall be included with the permit application and shall include a
description of how the owner or operator will meet the testing and monitoring
requirements, including accessing sites for all necessary monitoring and testing
during the life of the project.
B. Testing and monitoring associated with geologic sequestration projects
shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(1) Analysis of the carbon dioxide stream with sufficient frequency to yield
data representative of its chemical and physical characteristics.
(2) Installation and use of continuous recording devices to monitor injection
pressure, rate, and volume; the pressure on the tubing-casing annulus; and the
annulus fluid volume added. The department may waive this requirement during
approved well workovers.
(3) Corrosion monitoring of the well materials for loss of mass, thickness,
cracking, pitting, and other signs of corrosion, which shall be performed on a
quarterly basis to ensure that the well components meet the minimum standards for
material strength and performance by any of the following methods:
(a) Analyzing coupons of the well construction materials placed in contact
with the carbon dioxide stream.
(b) Routing the carbon dioxide stream through a loop constructed with the
material used in the well and inspecting the materials in the loop.
(c) Using an alternative method approved by the department.
Page 27 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(4) Quarterly monitoring of the ground water quality and geochemical
changes above the confining zone that may be a result of carbon dioxide movement
through the confining zone or additional identified zones, including:
(a) The location and number of monitoring wells based on specific
information about the geologic sequestration project, including injection rate and
volume, geology, the presence of artificial penetrations, and other factors.
(b) The monitoring frequency and spatial distribution of monitoring wells
based on baseline geochemical data that has been collected as required in the permit
application and on any modeling results in the required area of review evaluation.
(5) A demonstration of external mechanical integrity as required pursuant
to this Part at least once every twelve months until the injection well is permanently
plugged and abandoned and, if required by the department, a casing inspection log
pursuant to requirements of this Part at a frequency established in the testing and
monitoring plan.
(6) A pressure fall-off test at least once every five years, unless more
frequent testing is required by the department based on site-specific information.
(7) Direct and indirect testing and monitoring to track the extent of the
carbon dioxide plume and the presence or absence of elevated pressure using direct
and indirect methods. The department may determine that indirect methods are not
appropriate based on site-specific geology.
(8) The department may require surface air monitoring and soil gas
monitoring to detect movement of carbon dioxide that could endanger an
underground source of drinking water as appropriate under federal regulations.
(9) Any additional monitoring required by the department as necessary to
support, upgrade, and improve computational modeling of the required area of
review evaluation and to determine compliance with well completion and site
reassessment requirements.
(10) The owner or operator shall periodically review the testing and
monitoring plan to incorporate monitoring and operational data collected and the
Page 28 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
most recent area of review reevaluation. In no case shall the owner or operator
review the testing and monitoring plan less often than once every five years. Based
on this review, the owner or operator shall submit an amended testing and
monitoring plan or demonstrate to the department that no amendment to the testing
and monitoring plan is needed. Any amendments to the testing and monitoring plan
are subject to approval by the department. Any approved amendments shall be
incorporated into the permit and subject to the permit modification requirements
where deemed appropriate by the department. Amended plans or demonstrations
shall be submitted to the department as follows:
(a) Within one year of an area of review reevaluation.
(b) Following any significant changes to the facility.
(c) When required by the department.
(11) A quality assurance and surveillance plan for all testing and monitoring
requirements.
C. Monitoring and records.
(1) Samples and measurements taken for the purpose of monitoring shall be
representative of the monitored activity.
(2) The permittee shall retain records of all monitoring information,
including the following:
(a) Calibration and maintenance records and all original strip chart
recordings for continuous monitoring instrumentation, copies of all reports required
by the permit, and records of all data used to complete the application for this permit,
for a period of at least three years from the date of the sample, measurement, report,
or application. This period may be extended by the department at any time.
(b) The nature and composition of all injected fluids until three years after
the completion of any plugging and abandonment procedures. The department may
require the owner or operator to deliver the records to the department at the
conclusion of the retention period.
(3) Records of monitoring information shall include:
Page 29 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(a) The date, exact place, and time of sampling or measurements.
(b) The individuals who performed the sampling or measurements.
(c) The dates analyses were performed.
(d) The individuals who performed the analyses.
(e) The analytical techniques or methods used.
(f) The results of such analyses.
§1121.30. Mechanical integrity; monitoring
A. A Class VI well has mechanical integrity if both of the following apply:
(1) There is no significant leak in the casing, tubing, or packer.
(2) There is no significant fluid movement into an underground source of
drinking water through channels adjacent to the injection wellbore.
B. To evaluate the absence of significant leaks, owners or operators shall do
all of the following:
(1) Perform an annulus pressure test at the following times:
(a) After initial well construction or conversion as part of the pre-operating
requirements.
(b) At least once every twelve months, witnessed by an agent of the
department.
(c) After performing any well remedial work that involves unseating the
tubing or packer.
(2) Continuously monitor injection pressure, rate, and injected volumes;
pressure on the annulus between tubing and long-string casing; and annulus fluid
volume.
C. To determine the absence of significant fluid movement, the owner or
operator shall use one of the following methods at least once every twelve months:
(1) An approved tracer-type survey.
(2) A temperature or noise log.
Page 30 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
D. If required by the department, run a casing inspection log at a frequency
specified in the testing and monitoring plan to determine the presence or absence of
corrosion in the long-string casing.
E. The department may require other tests to evaluate well mechanical
integrity and may allow the use of a test other than those provided in this Subsection
with written approval from the United States Environmental Protection Agency. To
obtain approval for the use of a new mechanical integrity test, the owner or operator
must submit a written request to the department with details of the proposed test and
all technical data supporting its use.
F. In conducting and evaluating the tests provided for in this Subsection, the
owner or operator and the department shall apply methods and standards generally
accepted in the industry. When the owner or operator reports the results of
mechanical integrity tests to the department, a description of the test and the methods
used shall be included. The department shall review monitoring and other test data
submitted since the previous evaluation.
G. The department may require additional or alternative tests if the
mechanical integrity test results presented do not adequately demonstrate that there
is no significant leak in the casing, tubing, or packer or that there is no significant
movement of fluid into an underground source of drinking water resulting from the
injection activity.
§1121.31. Reporting; records retention
A. The owner or operator shall provide, at a minimum, the following reports
to the department for each permitted Class VI well:
(1) Quarterly reports containing the following information:
(a) Any changes to the physical, chemical, and other relevant characteristics
of the carbon dioxide stream from the proposed operating data.
(b) Monthly average, maximum, and minimum values for injection pressure,
flow rate and volume, and annular pressure.
Page 31 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(c) A description of any event that exceeds operating parameters for annulus
pressure or injection pressure specified in the permit.
(d) A description of any event which triggers a required shut-off device and
the response taken.
(e) The monthly volume or mass of the carbon dioxide stream injected over
the reporting period and the volume injected cumulatively over the life of the project.
(f) Monthly annulus fluid volumes gained or lost.
(g) The results of monitoring prescribed under R.S. 30:1121.29.
(2) Report, within thirty days or as otherwise specified by the permit, the
results of the following:
(a) Periodic tests of mechanical integrity.
(b) Any well workover.
(c) Any other test of the injection well conducted by the permittee as
required by the department.
(3)(a) Report within twenty-four hours all of the following:
(i) Any evidence that the injected carbon dioxide stream or associated
pressure front may cause an endangerment to an underground source of drinking
water.
(ii) Any noncompliance with a permit condition or malfunction of the
injection system which may cause fluid migration into or between underground
sources of drinking water.
(iii) Any triggering of a shut-off system.
(iv) Any failure to maintain mechanical integrity.
(v) Any release of carbon dioxide to the atmosphere or biosphere, surface
air, soil gas, or other monitoring technologies, if required by the department.
(b) Reports required by this Subparagraph shall, at a minimum, include the
following information:
(i) The precise location of the incident.
(ii) A description of the incident, including its cause, when possible.
Page 32 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(iii) Potential risks to public health, water sources, and land stability.
(iv) Immediate mitigation steps taken in response.
(v) A timeline for corrective action.
(c) Any report required by this Subparagraph shall also be disclosed by the
operator to the following persons and entities:
(i) All emergency response teams, local law enforcement, and local
governing officials within the affected area.
(ii) The general public through an official press release.
(d) The department shall publish all reports required by this Subparagraph
on its website.
B. Owners or operators shall notify the department in writing in advance of
doing any well work or formation testing.
C. Owners or operators of Class VI wells, or applicants for Class VI well
permits, shall submit all required submittals, reports, and notifications required as
prescribed by department and United States Environmental Protection Agency rules.
D. Records shall be retained by the owner or operator as provided in this
Subsection.
(1) The following records shall be retained throughout the life of the
geologic sequestration project and for at least ten years after site closure:
(a) All data collected for Class VI permit applications.
(b) Data on the nature and composition of all injected fluids collected.
(d) Monitoring data required to be collected.
(e) Well plugging reports; post-injection site care data including, if
appropriate, data and information used to develop the demonstration of the
alternative post-injection site care timeframe; and the site closure report required.
(2) Raw operating data from required continuous recording devices shall be
retained in digital format for at least ten years after collection.
(3) The department may require the owner or operator to retain any records
required under this Subpart for longer than ten years after site closure.
Page 33 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(4) The department may require the owner or operator to deliver the records
to the department at any time prior to or at the conclusion of the retention period.
E. Failure to comply with the requirements of this Section or with any
reporting or recordkeeping required by the department pursuant to administrative
rules shall subject the storage operator to the remedies authorized by R.S. 30:1106.
§1121.32. Plugging and abandonment
A. A Class VI permit shall include conditions that meet the requirements of
this Section. For purposes of this Section, temporary or intermittent cessation of
injection operations is not abandonment.
B. Before well plugging, the owner or operator shall flush each Class VI well
with a buffer fluid, determine bottomhole reservoir pressure, and perform a final
external mechanical integrity test.
C. Well plugging plan. The owner or operator of a Class VI well shall
prepare, maintain, and comply with a well plugging plan approved by the
department. The required contents of the well plugging plan shall be prescribed by
the department. The requirement to maintain and implement an approved plan is
directly enforceable regardless of whether the requirement is a condition of the
permit. The well plugging plan shall be submitted as part of the permit application
and shall be designed in a way that will prevent the movement of fluids into or
between underground sources of drinking water or outside the injection zone.
D. Notice of intent to plug. The owner or operator shall provide notice to the
department of the intent to plug a well, in a form prescribed by the department, and
receive written approval from the department before beginning well plugging
operations. The form shall contain information on the procedures to be used in the
field to plug and abandon the well.
E. Well closure report.
(1) The owner or operator shall submit a closure report to the department
within thirty days after well plugging and abandonment. The report shall be certified
Page 34 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
as accurate by the owner or operator and by the person charged with overseeing the
closure operation, if other than the owner or operator.
(2) The report shall contain the following information:
(a) Detailed procedures of the closure operation. Where actual closure
differed from the approved plan, the report shall include a written statement
specifying the differences between the previous plan and the actual closure.
(b) All state regulatory reporting forms relating to the closure activity.
(c) Any information pertinent to the closure activity, including schematics,
tests, or monitoring data.
(d) Any additional information required by the department.
§1121.33. Post-injection site care; site closure; post-closure
A. Post-injection site care and site closure plan.
(1) The owner or operator of a Class VI well shall prepare, maintain, and
comply with a plan for post-injection site care and site closure that meets the
requirements of this Section and is approved by the department. The requirement to
maintain and implement an approved plan is directly enforceable regardless of
whether the requirement is a condition of the permit. The owner or operator shall
submit the post-injection site care and site closure plan as a part of the permit
application. Required contents of the plan shall be prescribed by the department.
(2) Upon cessation of injection, owners or operators of Class VI wells shall
either submit an amended post-injection site care and site closure plan or
demonstrate to the department through monitoring data and modeling results that no
amendment to the plan is needed. Any amendments to the plan are subject to
approval by the department. Approved amendments shall be incorporated into the
permit and may be subject to permit modification, as required by rules promulgated
by the department.
(3) At any time during the life of the geologic sequestration project, the
owner or operator may modify and resubmit the post-injection site care and site
closure plan for department approval.
Page 35 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
B. Cessation of injection. The owner or operator shall monitor the site
following the cessation of injection to show the position of the carbon dioxide plume
and pressure front and to demonstrate that underground sources of drinking water are
not being endangered. Notwithstanding the approved timeline, monitoring shall
continue until the geologic sequestration project no longer poses an endangerment
to underground sources of drinking water and the demonstration under this Section
is submitted and approved by the department.
(1) Following the cessation of injection, the owner or operator shall continue
to conduct monitoring as specified in the department-approved post-injection site
care and site closure plan for at least fifty years or for the duration of an alternative
timeframe approved by the department pursuant to this Section.
(2) If the owner or operator can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the
department before fifty years or prior to the end of the approved alternative
timeframe, based on monitoring and other site-specific data, that the geologic
sequestration project no longer poses an endangerment to underground sources of
drinking water, the department may approve an amendment to the post-injection site
care and site closure plan to reduce the frequency of monitoring or authorize site
closure before the end of the fifty-year period or prior to the end of the approved
alternative timeframe, where the owner or operator has substantial evidence that the
geologic sequestration project no longer poses a risk of endangerment to
underground sources of drinking water.
(3) Prior to authorization for site closure, the owner or operator shall submit
to the department for review and approval a demonstration, based on monitoring and
other site-specific data, that no additional monitoring is needed to ensure that the
geologic sequestration project does not pose an endangerment to underground
sources of drinking water.
(4) If the demonstration cannot be made at the end of the fifty-year period
or at the end of the approved alternative timeframe, or if the department does not
approve the demonstration, the owner or operator shall submit to the department a
Page 36 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
plan to continue post-injection site care until a demonstration can be made and
approved.
(5) Demonstration of alternative post-injection site care timeframe. The
department may approve, in consultation with the United States Environmental
Protection Agency, an alternative post-injection site care timeframe other than the
fifty-year default, if an owner or operator can demonstrate during the permitting
process that an alternative post-injection site care timeframe is appropriate and
ensures non-endangerment of underground sources of drinking water. The
demonstration shall be based on significant, site-specific data and information,
including all data and information collected pursuant to the requirements for permit
applications, siting, and the area of review and corrective action plan, and shall
contain substantial evidence that the geologic sequestration project will no longer
pose a risk of endangerment to underground sources of drinking water at the end of
the alternative post-injection site care timeframe. Requirements for this
demonstration shall be prescribed by the department.
C. Site closure.
(1) Notice of intent for site closure. The owner or operator shall notify the
department in writing at least one hundred twenty days before site closure. At this
time, if any changes have been made to the original post-injection site care and site
closure plan, the owner or operator shall also provide the revised plan. The
department may allow for a shorter notice period.
(2) After the department has authorized site closure, the owner or operator
shall plug all monitoring wells in a manner which will not allow movement of
injection or formation fluids that endangers an underground source of drinking water.
(3) The owner or operator shall submit a site closure report in a form
prescribed by the department within ninety days after site closure and this report
shall be retained by the owner or operator for at least ten years.
(4) Each owner or operator of a Class VI injection well shall record a
notation on the deed to the facility property or any other document that is normally
Page 37 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
examined during title search that will in perpetuity provide any potential purchaser
of the property the following information:
(a) The fact that land has been used to sequester carbon dioxide.
(b) The name of the state agency, local authority, or tribe with which the
survey plat was filed, as well as the address of the United States Environmental
Protection Agency regional office to which it was submitted.
(c) The volume of fluid injected, the injection zone or zones into which it
was injected, and the period over which injection occurred.
(5) The owner or operator shall retain for at least ten years following site
closure records collected during the post-injection site care period. The owner or
operator shall deliver the records to the department at the conclusion of the retention
period and the records shall thereafter be retained in a form and manner and at a
location designated by the secretary.
D. Certificate of completion. The department shall not issue a certificate of
completion pursuant to R.S. 30:1107 unless the operator has sufficient financial
surety with the department to adequately close the facility, plug all existing wells,
and provide for post-injection site care and site closure.
SUBPART B. PIPELINE SAFETY REQUIREMENTS
§1121.41. General
A. No person may transport carbon dioxide through a pipe that is constructed
of material other than steel unless the person has notified the department and
PHMSA in writing of their intent to transport carbon dioxide and the material used
in construction of the pipeline. Transportation of carbon dioxide shall be prohibited
if it is determined by the department and the administrator that the transportation of
carbon dioxide in the manner proposed would be unduly hazardous.
B. No person may transport carbon dioxide unless it is chemically
compatible with the pipeline, all pipeline components, and any other commodity that
it may come into contact with while in the pipeline.
Page 38 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
§1121.42. Conversion of pipeline to service carbon dioxide
A. A steel pipeline previously used for purposes other than transporting
carbon dioxide may only qualify for conversion to such use if the operator shows to
the satisfaction of the department that conversion may be accomplished safely based
on historical data, testing, inspections, repairs, alterations, and any other data or
action deemed necessary or appropriate by the department to ensure safe conversion.
B. The department shall prescribe the manner by which an operator must
come into compliance with corrosion control requirements.
C. Each operator shall retain for the life of the pipeline a record of all
investigations, tests, repairs, replacements, alterations, or other data required by the
department.
§1121.43. Reporting of accidents and safety-related conditions
A. Any notification required by this Section shall be provided in a manner
prescribed by the department or PHMSA.
B. Accident reporting.
(1) An accident report is required for each failure in a pipeline system
subject to this Subpart in which there is a release of carbon dioxide resulting in any
of the following:
(a) Explosion or fire not intentionally set by the operator.
(b) A release of carbon dioxide above thresholds provided by rule.
(c) The death of any person.
(d) Personal injury or bodily harm to any person that necessitates medical
treatment or hospitalization or that results in loss of consciousness, the necessity to
carry a person from the scene, or disability which prevents the discharge of normal
duties or the pursuit of normal duties beyond the day of the accident.
(e) Property damage above thresholds provided by rule.
(f) Any potential danger to human beings or animals from the escaped
material.
Page 39 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(2) Telephonic notice shall be made at the earliest practicable moment
following discovery, but no later than one hour after confirmed discovery, of a
release resulting in any condition provided for in Subsection B of this Section or a
release that meets either of the following:
(a) Results in pollution of any stream, river, lake, reservoir, or other similar
body of water that violated applicable water quality standards, caused a discoloration
of the surface of the water or adjoining shoreline, or deposited a sludge or emulsion
beneath the surface of the water or upon adjoining shorelines.
(b) In the judgment of the operator, is significant even though it does not
meet the criteria of any other Paragraph of this Section.
(3) Within forty-eight hours after the confirmed discovery of an accident, an
operator shall revise or confirm its initial telephonic notice with a revised estimate
of the amount of product released, location of the failure, time of the failure, a
revised estimate of the number of fatalities and injuries, and all other significant facts
that are known by the operator that are relevant to the cause of the accident or extent
of the damages. If there are no changes or revisions to the initial report, the operator
shall confirm the estimates in its initial report.
C. Reporting safety-related conditions.
(1) Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, each operator
shall report in a manner prescribed by the department the existence of any of the
following safety-related conditions:
(a) General corrosion that has reduced the wall thickness to less than that
required for the maximum operating pressure and localized corrosion pitting that
may result in leakage.
(b) Unintended movement or abnormal loading of a pipeline by
environmental causes, such as an earthquake, landslide, or flood, that impairs its
serviceability.
(c) Any material defect or physical damage that impairs the serviceability
of a pipeline.
Page 40 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(d) Any malfunction or operating error that causes the pressure of a pipeline
to rise above one hundred ten percent of its maximum operating pressure.
(e) A leak in a pipeline that constitutes an emergency.
(f) Any safety-related condition that could lead to an imminent hazard and
causes, either directly or indirectly by remedial action of the operator, for purposes
other than abandonment, a twenty percent or more reduction in operating pressure
or shutdown of operation of a pipeline.
(2) A report is not required under this Subsection for any safety-related
condition that:
(a) Exists on a pipeline that is more than two hundred twenty yards from any
building intended for human occupancy or outdoor place of assembly and is not
within the right-of-way of an active railroad, paved road, street, or highway.
(b) Occurs offshore.
(c) Is required to be reported under Subsection B of this Section or results
in such an accident before the deadline for filing the safety-related condition report.
(d) Is a condition other than corrosion which is corrected by repair or
replacement in accordance with applicable safety standards before the deadline for
filing the safety-related condition report.
D. If the department investigates an accident, the operator involved shall
make all records and information that in any way pertain to the accident available to
the department and shall afford all reasonable assistance in the investigation of the
accident.
§1121.44. Design and construction
A. The following conditions shall be provided for in the design of a pipeline
system:
(1) Material for components of the system shall be chosen for the
temperature environment in which the components will be used so that the pipeline
will maintain its structural integrity and components of pipelines that are subject to
low temperatures during normal operation because of rapid pressure reduction or
Page 41 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
during the initial fill of the line shall be made of materials that are suitable for those
low temperatures.
(2) Variations in the pressure between two or more connected components
and external pressure that will be exerted on the pipe.
(3) Anticipated external loads, expansion and flexibility, and localized
stresses from supports.
(4) Analysis of potential propagating fractures and mitigation of the effects
of fracture propagation.
B. Any pipe installed in the pipeline system shall, at a minimum, comply
with the following:
(1) The pipe shall be made of steel of the carbon, low alloy-high strength,
or alloy type that is able to withstand the internal pressures and external loads and
pressures anticipated for the pipeline system.
(2) The pipe shall be made in accordance with a written pipe specification
that sets forth the chemical requirements for the pipe steel and mechanical tests for
the pipe to provide pipe suitable for the use intended.
C. Fittings shall be suitable for carbon dioxide transport, be at least as strong
as the pipe to which it is attached, and be free of any defects that may reduce the
strength of the fitting.
D. Unless provided otherwise by the department, each new pipeline and each
main line section of a pipeline where the line pipe, valve, fitting, or other line
component is replaced shall be designed and constructed to accommodate the
passage of instrumented internal inspection devices in accordance with accepted
industry standards.
E. Carbon dioxide may not be relieved into the atmosphere of a building or
other confined space where hazardous levels may accumulate above the human
exposure level set by the United States Department of Labor, Occupational Safety
and Health Administration unless the appropriate respiratory protection is provided.
F. Sensing devices.
Page 42 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(1) Each operator shall install sensing devices necessary to monitor the
operation of components used in transporting carbon dioxide to detect malfunction
which could cause a hazardous condition if permitted to continue.
(2) Buildings in which potentially hazardous quantities of carbon dioxide
may exist shall be continuously monitored by carbon dioxide sensing devices set to
activate audible and visual alarms in the building and at the control center.
G. Control systems for components on carbon dioxide pipelines shall have
a fail-safe design unless it is impractical under good engineering practices. A safe
condition shall be maintained until personnel take appropriate action to either
reactivate the component served or to prevent a hazard from occurring.
H. Electrical control systems, means of communication, emergency lighting,
and firefighting systems shall have at least two sources of power which function so
that failure of one source does not affect the capability of the other source. Where
auxiliary generators are used as a second source of electrical power, they shall be
located apart or protected from components so they are usable during a controllable
emergency and the fuel supply shall be protected from hazards.
I. Each pipeline system shall be constructed in accordance with
comprehensive written specifications or standards that are consistent with the
requirements of this Subpart.
J. The installation of pipe or pipeline systems shall be inspected to ensure
compliance with this Subpart.
(1) Any operator personnel used to perform the inspection shall be trained
and qualified in the phase of construction to be inspected. An operator shall not use
operator personnel to perform a required inspection if the operator personnel
performed the construction task requiring inspection.
(2) No pipe or other component may be installed in a pipeline system unless
it has been visually inspected at the site of installation to ensure that it is not
damaged in a manner that could impair its strength or reduce its serviceability.
K. Pipeline location.
Page 43 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(1) A pipeline right-of-way shall be selected to avoid, as far as practicable,
areas containing private dwellings, industrial buildings, and places of public
assembly.
(2) No pipeline may be located within fifty feet of any private dwelling,
industrial building, or place of public assembly in which persons work, congregate,
or assemble, unless it is provided with at least twelve inches of cover in addition to
the cover prescribed by rule.
L. Pressure testing.
(1) No operator may operate a pipeline unless it has been pressure tested
without leakage. In addition, no operator may return to service a segment of pipeline
that has been replaced, relocated, or otherwise changed until it has been pressure
tested without leakage.
(2) Pipelines transporting carbon dioxide shall be hydrostatically tested
without leakage.
(3) All pipe and attached fittings, including components, shall be pressure
tested unless otherwise permitted by the department.
(4) Water shall be used as the test medium unless another medium is
approved by the department.
(5) The operator shall make a record of each pressure test required by this
Section and the record of the latest test shall be retained as long as the pipeline is in
use.
M. Shut-off valves.
(1) For newly constructed and entirely replaced onshore carbon dioxide
pipeline segments with diameters of six inches or greater that could affect
high-consequence areas or are located in high consequence areas, an operator shall
install or use existing rupture-mitigation valves or alternative equivalent
technologies.
Page 44 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(2) The installation and use of rupture-mitigation valves and alternative
equivalents shall be governed by department rules which provide for, at a minimum,
the following:
(a) Maximum spacing between valves.
(b) Shut-off segments and shut-off segment valve spacing.
(c) Laterals extending from shut-off segments.
(d) Crossovers connections.
(e) The use of manual valves.
(f) Valve capabilities, such as rupture identification and valve shut-off time,
shut-off capability, valve monitoring and operational capabilities, monitoring of
valve shut-off response status, and flow modeling for automatic shut-off valves.
(3) Operators shall maintain each valve that is necessary for the safe
operation of its pipeline systems in good working order at all times. Required
maintenance includes but is not limited to the following measures:
(a) At least twice each calendar year, but at intervals not exceeding seven
and one half months, operators shall inspect and partially operate each mainline
valve to determine whether it is functioning properly.
(b) Provide protection for each valve from unauthorized operation and from
vandalism.
§1121.45. Operation and maintenance
A. No operator may operate or maintain its pipeline systems at a level of
safety lower than the that required by this Section.
B. An operator shall make all repairs on its pipeline system according to the
following integrity management requirements:
(1) Whenever an operator discovers any condition that could adversely affect
the safe operation of its pipeline system, it shall correct the condition within a
reasonable time. However, if the condition is of such a nature that it presents an
immediate hazard to persons or property, the operator may not operate the affected
part of the system until it has corrected the unsafe condition.
Page 45 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(2) When an operator discovers a condition on a pipeline that could affect
high-consequence areas or are located in high consequence areas, the operator shall
correct the condition as prescribed by R.S. 30:1121.49 and department rules
regarding pipeline integrity management.
(3) An operator shall consider the risk to people, property, and the
environment in prioritizing the correction of any conditions provided for under this
Paragraph.
C. Maps and records.
(1) Each operator shall maintain current maps and records of its pipeline
systems that include at least the following:
(a) The location and identification of pipeline facilities.
(b) All crossings of public roads, railroads, rivers, buried utilities, and
foreign pipelines.
(c) The maximum operating pressure of each pipeline.
(d) The diameter, grade, type, and nominal wall thickness of all pipe.
(2) Each operator shall maintain for at least three years daily operating
records that indicate the discharge pressure at each pump station and any emergency
or abnormal operation to which the procedures under R.S. 30:1121.46 apply.
(3) Each operator shall maintain the following records for the periods
specified:
(a) The date, location, and description of each repair made to pipe shall be
retained for the useful life of the pipe.
(b) The date, location, and description of each repair made to parts of the
pipeline system other than pipe shall be retained for at least one year.
(c) A record of each inspection and test required by this Subpart and
department rules shall be retained for at least two years or until the next inspection
or test is performed, whichever is longer.
Page 46 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
D. Communications. Each operator shall have a communication system to
provide for the transmission of information needed for the safe operation of its
pipeline system which shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(1) Monitoring operational data as required by R.S. 30:1121.46.
(2) Receiving notices from operator personnel, the public, and public
authorities of abnormal or emergency conditions and sending this information to
appropriate personnel or government agencies for corrective action.
(3) Conducting two-way vocal communication between a control center and
the scene of abnormal operations and emergencies.
(4) Providing communication with fire, police, and other appropriate public
officials during emergency conditions, including a natural disaster.
E. Line markers and signs.
(1) Unless the department provides otherwise, each operator shall place and
maintain line markers over each buried pipeline in accordance with the following:
(a) Markers shall be located at each public road crossing, at each railroad
crossing, and in sufficient number along the remainder of each buried line so that its
location is accurately known.
(b) The markers shall state at least the following on a background of sharply
contrasting color:
(i) The word "warning", "caution", or "danger" followed by the words
"carbon dioxide pipeline", all of which shall be in letters at least one inch high with
an approximate stroke of one quarter of an inch.
(ii) The name of the operator and a telephone number including the area code
where the operator can be reached at all times.
(2) Each operator shall provide line marking at locations where the line is
above ground in areas that are accessible to the public.
(3) Each operator shall maintain signs visible to the public around each
pumping station. Each sign shall contain the name of the operator and a telephone
number, including the area code, where the operator can be reached at all times.
Page 47 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
F. Each operator shall, at intervals not exceeding three weeks but at least
twenty-six times each calendar year, inspect the surface conditions on or adjacent to
each pipeline right-of-way and crossing under navigable waters. Methods of
inspection include walking, driving, flying, or other appropriate means of traversing
the right-of-way.
G. Inspections of pipelines in areas affected by extreme weather and natural
disasters.
(1) Following an extreme weather event or natural disaster that has the
likelihood of damaging infrastructure by the scouring or movement of the soil
surrounding the pipeline, an operator shall inspect all potentially affected pipeline
facilities to detect conditions that could adversely affect the safe operation of that
pipeline.
(2) An operator shall consider the nature of the event and the physical
characteristics, operating conditions, location, and prior history of the affected
pipeline in determining the appropriate method for performing the initial inspection
to determine the extent of any damage and the need for the additional assessments
required under Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
(3) Inspections shall commence within seventy-two hours after the cessation
of the event. In the event that the operator is unable to commence the inspection due
to the unavailability of personnel or equipment, the operator shall notify the
appropriate PHMSA Region Director and the department's pipeline division for
intrastate facilities as soon as practicable.
(4) An operator shall take prompt and appropriate remedial action to ensure
the safe operation of a pipeline based on the information obtained as a result of
performing the inspection.
H. Each operator shall maintain adequate firefighting equipment at each
pump station which shall be maintained in proper operating condition at all times,
plainly marked so that its identity as firefighting equipment is clear, located so that
it is easily accessible during a fire.
Page 48 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
I. Each operator shall provide protection for each pumping station and other
exposed facility from vandalism and unauthorized entry.
J. Each operator of a buried pipeline shall develop and carry out a written
program to prevent damage to that pipeline from excavation activities, which may
be accomplished through participation in a public service program.
§1121.46. Procedural manual for operations, maintenance, and emergencies.
A. Each operator shall prepare and follow for each pipeline system a manual
of written procedures for conducting normal operations and maintenance activities
and handling abnormal operations and emergencies. This manual shall be reviewed
at least one each calendar year and at intervals of not more than fifteen months and
appropriate changes made as necessary to ensure that the manual is effective.
B. The manual shall be prepared before initial operations of a pipeline
system commence and appropriate parts shall be kept at locations where operations
and maintenance activities are conducted.
C. The administrator or the department may, after notice and opportunity for
hearing, require the operator to amend its plans and procedures as necessary to
provide a reasonable level of safety.
D. Maintenance and normal operations. The manual required by this Section
shall include procedures for the following to provide safety during maintenance and
normal operations:
(1) Making construction records, maps, and operating history available as
necessary for safe operation and maintenance.
(2) Gathering data needed for reporting accidents in a timely and effective
manner.
(3) Operating, maintaining, and repairing the pipeline system in accordance
with the provisions of this Subpart.
(4) Determining which pipeline facilities are in areas that would require an
immediate response by the operator to prevent hazards to the public, property, or the
environment if the facilities fail or malfunction, including determination of segments
Page 49 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
in high-consequence areas or that could affect high-consequence areas,
rupture-mitigation valves, and emergency flow restricting devices.
(5) Investigating and analyzing pipeline accidents and failures. The
following shall be included or incorporated into the manual regarding pipelines
accidents and failures:
(a) Procedures for sending the failed pipe, component, or equipment for
laboratory testing or examination where appropriate, to determine the causes and
contributing factors of the failure and to minimize the possibility of a recurrence.
(b) Lessons learned from a post-failure and accident review.
(c) Post-failure and post-accident analysis of a failure or accident that
involves the closure of a rupture-mitigation valve or alternative equivalent
technology and all the factors that may have impacted the release volume and the
consequences of the release, including but not limited to the following:
(i) Detection, identification, operational response, system shut-off, and
emergency-response communications, based on the type and volume of the release
or failure event.
(ii) Appropriateness and effectiveness of procedures and pipeline systems,
including supervisory control and data acquisition, communications, valve shut-off,
and operator personnel.
(iii) Actual response time from identifying a rupture following a notification
of potential rupture to initiation of mitigative actions and isolation of the segment
and the appropriateness and effectiveness of the mitigative actions taken.
(iv) Location and timeliness of actuation of all rupture-mitigation valves or
alternative equivalent technologies.
(v) All other factors the operator deems appropriate.
(d) Post-failure and post-accident summary of a failure or accident that
involves the identification of a rupture following a notification of potential rupture
or the closure of a rupture-mitigation valve or alternative equivalent technology.
Page 50 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(i) The operator shall complete a summary of the post-failure or
post-accident review required by Subparagraph (c) of this Paragraph within ninety
days of the failure or accident.
(ii) The operator shall conduct quarterly status reviews until the investigation
is completed and a final post-failure or post-accident review is prepared.
(iii) The final post-failure or post-accident summary and all other reviews
and analyses produced under the requirements of this Paragraph shall be reviewed,
dated, and signed by the operator’s appropriate senior executive officer.
(iv) The operator shall retain the final post-failure or post-accident summary,
all investigation and analysis documents used to prepare it, and records of lessons
learned for the useful life of the pipeline.
(6) Minimizing the potential for hazards and the possibility of recurrence of
accidents identified and analyzed under Paragraph (5) of this Subsection.
(7) Starting up and shutting down any part of the pipeline system in a
manner designed to ensure operation within the allowable maximum operating
pressure, considering the carbon dioxide in transportation, variations in altitude
along the pipeline, and pressure monitoring and control devices.
(8) In the case of a pipeline that is not equipped to fail safe, monitoring from
an attended location of pipeline pressure during start-up until steady state pressure
and flow conditions are reached and during shut-in to assure operation within the
allowable maximum operating pressure.
(9) In the case of facilities not equipped to fail safe that are located in
high-consequence areas or that could affect high-consequence areas or that control
receipt and delivery of the carbon dioxide, detecting abnormal operating conditions
by monitoring pressure, temperature, flow or other appropriate operational data and
transmitting this data to an attended location.
(10) Abandoning pipeline facilities, including safe disconnection from an
operating pipeline system, purging of combustibles, and sealing abandoned facilities
left in place to minimize safety and environmental hazards. For each abandoned
Page 51 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
offshore pipeline facility or each abandoned onshore pipeline facility that crosses
over, under or through commercially navigable waterways the last operator of that
facility shall file a report upon abandonment of that facility in accordance with
department rules.
(11) Minimizing the likelihood of accidental ignition of vapors in areas near
facilities that are located in high-consequence areas or that could affect
high-consequence areas, where the potential exists for the presence of flammable
liquids or gases.
(12) Establishing and maintaining adequate means of communication with
the appropriate public safety answering point, where direct access to a 9-1-1
emergency call center is available from the location of the pipeline, and fire, police,
and other public officials.
(a) Operators shall determine the responsibilities, resources, jurisdictional
areas, and emergency contact telephone numbers for both local and out-of-area calls
of each federal, state, and local government organization that may respond to a
pipeline emergency.
(b) Operators shall inform such organizations or appropriate officials about
the operator's ability to respond to the pipeline emergency and means of
communication during emergencies.
(c) Operators may establish a liaison with the appropriate local emergency
coordinating agencies, such as 9-1-1 emergency call centers or parish emergency
managers, in lieu of communicating individually with each fire, police, or other
public entity.
(13) Periodically reviewing the work done by operator personnel to
determine the effectiveness of the procedures used in normal operation and
maintenance and taking corrective action where deficiencies are found.
(14) Taking adequate precautions in excavated trenches to protect personnel
from the hazards of unsafe accumulations of vapor or gas, and making available
Page 52 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
when needed at the excavation, emergency rescue equipment, including a breathing
apparatus and, a rescue harness and line.
(15) Implementing applicable control room management procedures required
by department rules.
E. Abnormal operation. The manual required by this Section shall include
procedures for the following to provide safety when operating design limits have
been exceeded:
(1) Responding to, investigating, and correcting the cause of any of the
following:
(a) Unintended closure of valves or shutdowns.
(b) Increase or decrease in pressure or flow rate outside normal operating
limits.
(c) Loss of communications.
(d) Operation of any safety device.
(e) Any other malfunction of a component, deviation from normal operation,
or personnel error which could cause a hazard to persons or property.
(2) Checking variations from normal operation after abnormal operation has
ended at sufficient critical locations in the system to determine continued integrity
and safe operation.
(3) Correcting variations from normal operation of pressure and flow
equipment and controls.
(4) Notifying responsible operator personnel when notice of an abnormal
operation is received.
(5) Periodically reviewing the response of operator personnel to determine
the effectiveness of the procedures controlling abnormal operation and taking
corrective action where deficiencies are found.
F. Emergencies. The manual required by this Section shall include
procedures for the following to provide safety when an emergency condition occurs:
Page 53 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(1) Receiving, identifying, and classifying notices of events that need
immediate response by the operator or notice to the appropriate public safety
answering point, where direct access to a 9-1-1 emergency call center is available
from the location of the pipeline, and fire, police, and other appropriate public
officials, and communicating this information to appropriate operator personnel for
prompt corrective action.
(2) Operators may establish a liaison with the appropriate local emergency
coordinating agencies, such as 9-1-1 emergency call centers or parish emergency
managers, in lieu of communicating individually with each fire, police, or other
public entity.
(3) Prompt and effective response to a notice of each type of emergency,
including fire or explosion occurring near or directly involving a pipeline facility,
accidental release of carbon dioxide from a pipeline facility, operational failure
causing a hazardous condition, and natural disasters affecting pipeline facilities.
(4) Having personnel, equipment, instruments, tools, and material available
as needed at the scene of an emergency.
(5) Taking necessary actions, including but not limited to, emergency
shutdown, valve shut-off, or pressure reduction, in any section of the operator’s
pipeline system, to minimize hazards of released carbon dioxide to life, property, or
the environment.
(6) Each operator shall also develop written rupture identification procedures
to evaluate and identify whether a notification of potential rupture is an actual
rupture event or non-rupture event. These procedures shall, at a minimum, specify
the sources of information, operational factors, and other criteria that operator
personnel use to evaluate a notification of potential rupture.
(7) Control of released carbon dioxide at an accident scene to minimize the
hazards, including possible intentional ignition in the cases of flammable highly
volatile liquid.
Page 54 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(8) Minimization of public exposure and probability of accidental ignition
by assisting with evacuation of residents and with halting traffic on roads and
railroads in the affected area, or taking other appropriate action.
(9) Notifying the appropriate public safety answering point and fire, police,
and other public officials of carbon dioxide pipeline emergencies to coordinate and
share information to determine the location of the release, including both planned
responses and actual responses during an emergency, and any additional precautions
necessary. The operator shall immediately and directly notify the appropriate public
safety answering point or other coordinating agency for the communities and
jurisdictions in which the pipeline is located after notification of potential rupture has
occurred to coordinate and share information to determine the location of the release.
(10) Providing for a post-accident review of employee activities to determine
whether the procedures were effective in each emergency and taking corrective
action where deficiencies are found.
(11) Actions required to be taken by a controller during an emergency, in
accordance with the operator’s emergency plans and department rules.
G. Safety-related condition reports. The manual required by this Section
shall include instructions enabling personnel who perform operation and
maintenance activities to recognize conditions that may be safety-related conditions
that are subject to the reporting requirements of R.S. 30:1121.43 and department
rules.
§1121.47. Emergency response training
A. Each operator shall establish and conduct a continuing training program
to instruct emergency response personnel to:
(1) Carry out the emergency procedures established pursuant to R.S.
30:1121.46 that relate to their assignments.
(2) Know the characteristics and hazards of the carbon dioxide transported.
Page 55 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(3) Recognize conditions that are likely to cause emergencies, predict the
consequences of facility malfunctions or failures and carbon dioxide spills, and take
appropriate corrective action.
(4) Take steps necessary to control any accidental release of carbon dioxide
and to minimize the potential for fire, explosion, toxicity, or environmental damage.
(5) Learn the potential causes, types, sizes, and consequences of fire and the
appropriate use of portable fire extinguishers and other on-site fire control
equipment, involving, where feasible, a simulated pipeline emergency condition.
B. At the intervals not exceeding fifteen months, but at least once each
calendar year, each operator shall:
(1) Review with personnel their performance in meeting the objectives of the
emergency response training program set forth in Subsection A of this Section.
(2) Make appropriate changes to the emergency response training program
as necessary to ensure that it is effective.
C. Each operator shall require and verify that its supervisors maintain a
thorough knowledge of that portion of the emergency response procedures
established in the procedural manual for which they are responsible to ensure
compliance.
§1121.48. Public awareness
A. Each pipeline operator shall develop and implement a written continuing
public education program.
B. The program shall specifically include provisions to educate the public,
appropriate government organizations, and persons engaged in excavation related
activities regarding the following:
(1) Use of a one-call notification system prior to excavation and other
damage prevention activities.
(2) Possible hazards associated with unintended releases from a carbon
dioxide pipeline facility.
(3) Physical indications that such a release may have occurred.
Page 56 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(4) Steps that should be taken for public safety in the event of a carbon
dioxide pipeline release.
(5) Procedures to report a release.
C. The program shall include activities to advise affected municipalities,
school districts, businesses, and residents of pipeline facility locations.
D. The program and the media used shall be as comprehensive as necessary
to reach all areas in which the operator transports carbon dioxide.
E. The program shall be conducted in English and in other languages
commonly understood by a significant number and concentration of the non-English
speaking population in the operator’s area.
F. Upon request, operators shall submit their completed programs to
PHMSA or, in the case of an intrastate pipeline facility operator, the department.
G. The operator’s program documentation and evaluation results shall be
available for periodic review by appropriate regulatory agencies.
§1121.49. Pipeline integrity management in high consequence areas
A. This Section applies to each carbon dioxide pipeline that could affect a
high consequence area, including any pipeline located in a high consequence area,
unless the operator effectively demonstrates by risk assessment that the pipeline
could not affect the area.
B. Each operator of a pipeline covered by this Section shall develop and
implement a written integrity management program in compliance with department
rules. The operator shall include, at minimum, each of the following elements in its
written integrity management program:
(1) A process for identifying which pipeline segments could affect a high
consequence area.
(2) A baseline assessment plan.
(3) An analysis that integrates all available information about the integrity
of the entire pipeline and the consequences of a failure.
Page 57 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(4) Criteria for remedial actions to address integrity issues raised by the
assessment methods and information analysis.
(5) A continual process of assessment and evaluation to maintain a pipeline’s
integrity.
(6) Identification of preventive and mitigative measures to protect the high
consequence area.
(7) Methods to measure the program’s effectiveness.
(8) A process for review of integrity assessment results and information
analysis by a person qualified to evaluate the results and information.
(9) Procedures for providing a copy of the operator's risk analysis or integrity
management program to the department upon request.
§1121.50. Qualification of pipeline personnel
A. This Section prescribes the minimum requirements for operator
qualification of individuals performing covered tasks on a pipeline facility. For the
purposes of this Section, a covered task is any operations or maintenance task
required by this Subpart or department rules to be performed on a pipeline facility
that affects the operation or integrity of the pipeline.
B. Each operator shall have and follow a written qualification program. The
program shall include provisions to:
(1) Identify covered tasks.
(2) Ensure through evaluation that individuals performing covered tasks are
qualified.
(3) Allow individuals that are not qualified pursuant to this Section to
perform a covered task if directed and observed by an individual that is qualified.
(4) Evaluate an individual if the operator has reason to believe that the
individual’s performance of a covered task contributed to an accident as defined in
this Subpart.
(5) Evaluate an individual if the operator has reason to believe that the
individual is no longer qualified to perform a covered task.
Page 58 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
(6) Communicate changes that affect covered tasks to individuals performing
those covered tasks.
(7) Identify those covered tasks and the intervals at which evaluation of the
individual’s qualifications is needed.
(8) Provide training, as appropriate, to ensure that individuals performing
covered tasks have the necessary knowledge and skills to perform the tasks in a
manner that ensures the safe operation of pipeline facilities.
C. Each operator shall maintain records that demonstrate compliance with
this Section.
(1) Qualification records shall include the following:
(a) Identification of qualified individuals.
(b) Identification of the covered tasks the individual is qualified to perform.
(c) Date or dates of current qualification.
(d) Qualification methods.
(2) Records supporting an individual’s current qualification shall be
maintained while the individual is performing the covered task. Records of prior
qualification and records of individuals no longer performing covered tasks shall be
retained for a period of five years.
D. The written qualification program shall be available for review by the
administrator or by the department.
§1121.51. Enforcement
A. Officers, employees, or agents authorized by the secretary, upon
presenting proper credentials, are authorized to enter upon, inspect and examine, at
reasonable times and in a reasonable manner, the records and properties of persons
to the extent that such records and properties are relevant to determining compliance
with this Subpart.
B. Inspection may be conducted pursuant to a routine schedule, a complaint
received from a member of the public, information obtained from a previous
Page 59 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156
inspection, report of accident or incident involving facilities, or whenever deemed
appropriate by the secretary.
C. If, after inspection, the secretary believes that further information is
required to determine compliance or appropriate action, the secretary may request
specific information of the person or operator to be answered within ten days of
receipt of the request.
D. The secretary may, to the extent necessary to carry out his
responsibilities, require reasonable testing of any portion of a facility in connection
with a violation or suspected violation.
E. When information obtained from an inspection indicates that a violation
has probably occurred, the inspector shall complete a field inspection report about
the nature of the violation, citing the specific provisions which have been violated.
The field inspection report shall be filed with the secretary for review and further
action, if appropriate.
F. The secretary or his agent, after review of the field inspection report, and
depending upon the severity of the violation and the exigency of the situation, may
issue to the operator a letter of noncompliance or initiate one or more enforcement
proceedings prescribed by department rules.
Section 2. R.S. 30:1107.1, 1107.2, 1113, and 1114 are hereby repealed in their
entirety.
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
alphabetize and renumber the definitions contained in R.S. 30:1103 and to correct any
cross-references to the renumbered paragraphs if necessary, consistent with the provisions
of this Act.
Section 4. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to designate R.S.
30:1101 through 1115 as Part I of Chapter 11 of Subtitle I of Title 30 of the Revised
Statutes, entitled "GENERAL PROVISIONS".
Page 60 of 67
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-339 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1156